Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 80B.11D, subsections 3, 5, and 6, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 3. An individual who submits an application pursuant to subsection 1 shall, at a minimum, submit proof of successful completion of a two-year or four-year police science or criminal justice program at an accredited educational institution approved by the academy, and or meet the qualifications set forth in section 80B.11H, subsections subsection 1 and or 3 . 5. This section applies only to individuals who apply for certification through a short course of study level II academy training program as established by rule. 6. An individual who has not been hired by a law enforcement agency must be hired by a law enforcement agency within House File 2199, p. 2 eighteen months of completing the short course of study level II academy training program in order to obtain certification pursuant to this section . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2199, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor